Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.150

Transcribing mutilated records.

The county commissioners shall, when any of the county records become so mutilated that their handling becomes dangerous to the safety of such records, and when in the judgment of the county commissioners it may become necessary to, order the transcribing of said records at a sum not exceeding eight cents per folio of one hundred words, in books to be provided for that purpose by the county.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.32.150. Prior: 1893 c 14 s 1; RRS s 4065.]